Mississippi, session 2026, SB3105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026 $ 0.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses of the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services. SECTION 2.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Governor's Office-Division of Medicaid for the period beginning upon passage and ending June 30, 2027........... $ 0.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses of the Department of Finance and Administration. SECTION 3.  In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Department of Public Safety for the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026........................ $ 0.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses of the Department of Public Safety. SECTION 4. In addition to all other sums herein appropriated, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Mississippi Board of Medical Licensure and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office, to defray the expenses of the Mississippi Board of Medical Licensure for the period beginning upon passage of this act, and ending June 30, 2027................................... $   1.00. This additional appropriation is for the purpose of defraying expenses of the Mississippi Board of Medical Licensure. SECTION 5.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and shall stand repealed on the day before its passage.